Arkansas, session 2025, HB1486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-67-322(c), concerning the reacquisition
of a surplus right-of-way parcel acquired by the State Highway Commission, is
amended to read as follows:
(c)(1) When an entire right-of-way parcel is declared surplus, it may
be reacquired under this option by refunding the price for which it was
acquired by the State Highway Commission.
(2) When only a remnant or portion of the original acquisition is
declared surplus by the State Highway Commission, it may be reacquired at its
market value at the time it is declared surplus.
(3) The market value shall be determined by three (3) two (2)
appraisers certified or licensed under § 17-14-101 et seq.




*ZRC015*
02/13/2025 11:55:23 AM ZRC015